Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.100

Powers conferred by chapter are supplemental.

The powers and authority conferred by this chapter shall be construed as in addition and supplemental to powers or authority conferred by any other law, and nothing contained herein shall be construed as limiting any other powers or authority of any public agency.

[ 1967 c 239 s 11.]